Hawaii statutes.
§577-3.5 Property damage, parental
responsibility. (a) The parents or legal guardians of a minor child shall
be jointly and severally liable for graffiti damage caused by the minor to real
or personal property, whether publicly or privately owned. As used in this
section, "graffiti" means any unauthorized drawing, inscription,
figure, or marking created by paint, ink, chalk, dye, or similar substances.

(b) In addition to any other lawful orders, if
a minor is found under chapter 571 to have committed an act constituting
graffiti, the court shall:

(1) Require the minor, the parents, or the legal
guardians to remove the graffiti from the affected property within sixty days
of the order and pay for the cost of paint and materials; or if appropriate,
pay for the actual cost of having the damaged property repaired or replaced;
and

(2) Order the minor to perform a minimum of eighty
hours of community service to remove graffiti from other properties.

(c) Nothing in this section shall affect the
right of any person to maintain a civil action arising out of graffiti damage
to property. [L 1995, c 227, §1; am L 2007, c 196, §1]

Cross References

Graffiti.

County property, see §46-1.5.

Criminal property damage, see §§708-820 to 708-823.6.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next